Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-
503.1j, is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-503.1j. A. Any licensee of a money transmission,
transmitter or wire transmitter business pursuant to the Oklahoma
Financial Transaction Reporting Act and their delegates shall
collect:
1. For transactions occurring within the United States, collect
a fee of Five Dollars ($5.00) for each transaction not in excess of
Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and in addition to such fee an amount
equal to one percent (1%) of the amount in excess of Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00); and
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2169 Page 1

2. For transactions occurring outside of the United States,
collect a fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each transaction not in
excess of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and in addition to such fee
an amount equal to two percent (2%) of the amount in excess of Five
Hundred Dollars ($500.00).
B. The fee prescribed by subsection A of this section shall be
remitted quarterly to the Oklahoma Tax Commission on such forms as
the Commission, with the assistance of the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, may prescribe for such
purpose. All required forms and remittances shall be filed with the
Tax Commission not later than the fifteenth day of the month
following the close of each calendar quarter.
C. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall apportion all revenues
derived from the fee to the Drug Money Laundering and Wire
Transmitter Organized Crime and Human Trafficking Revolving Fund.
D. Every licensee and their delegates shall post a notice on a
form prescribed by the Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control that notifies customers that
upon filing an individual income tax return with either a valid
social security Social Security number or a valid taxpayer
identification number the customer shall be entitled to an income
tax credit equal to the amount of the fee paid by the customer for
the transaction.

ENGR. H. B. NO. 2169 Page 2

E. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall be afforded all provisions
currently under law to enforce the provisions of subsection B of
this section. If a licensee fails to file reports or fails to remit
the fee authorized by subsection B of this section, the Oklahoma Tax
Commission shall have the authority pursuant to Section 212 of Title
68 of the Oklahoma Statutes to suspend the license of the licensee
and its delegates. A notification of the suspension shall also be
sent to the State Banking Commissioner and the Director of the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control. The
licensee and its delegates may not reapply for a license until all
required reports have been filed and all required fee amounts have
been remitted.
F. Upon request from the Oklahoma Tax Commission, the State
Banking Commissioner may make a claim against the surety bond of the
licensee on behalf of the State of Oklahoma.
G. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs
Control and its attorneys may assist the Oklahoma Tax Commission in
conducting audits and the prosecution and/or or seeking of legal
remedies to ensure compliance with this act.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-107b, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-107b. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
revolving fund for the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and
Dangerous Drugs Control to be designated the "Drug Money Laundering
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2169 Page 3

and Wire Transmitter Revolving Fund" "Organized Crime and Human
Trafficking Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund,
not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all
monies received by the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and
Dangerous Drugs Control from the fees imposed pursuant to Section 2-
503.1j of this title. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund
are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control for
the purpose of drug enforcement. Expenditures from said fund shall
be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 27th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate



ENGR. H. B. NO. 2169 Page 4